src/morphology/affixes/propernouns.lexc
LEXICON DAVVISUOLU-plc !!= @CODE@ Contracted stems ending on -oj. Place names.
                   +N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%>                DAVVISUOLUDECL ;
 +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen@U.Cap.Opt@:%>0000@U.Cap.Opt@ VUONAK         ;

!!€gt-norm: Victoriasuoloj # Contracted test
!!€ Victoriasuoloj:                Victoriasuoloj+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom
!!€ Victoriasuolluj:               Victoriasuoloj+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill
!!€ Victoriasuollus:               Victoriasuoloj+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ela

LEXICON DAVVISUOLUDECL !Inanim. Contracted -Names - from DAVVISUOLU
 @U.Cap.Obl@ DAVVISUOLU-OBL ;

LEXICON DAVVISUOLU-OBL
   +Sg+Nom:Q3j    K     ;
      +Ess:Q3n    K     ;
 +CmpN/SgN:Q3j    RHyph ;
   +Sg+Ill:X4j    K     ;
   +Sg+Gen:X4     K     ;
   +Sg+Acc:X4v    K     ;
   +Sg+Ine:X4n    K     ;
   +Sg+Ela:X4s    K     ;
! +Pl+Nom:X4 K ;
! +Pl+Gen:X4j K ;
! +Pl+Acc:X4jt K ;
! +Pl+Ill:X4jda K ;
! +Pl+Ine:X4jn K ;
! +Pl+Ela:X4js K ;
! +Pl+Com:X4j K ;
   +Sg+Com:X4X5jn K     ; ! X5 for o:u in ComSg. Note two dummies in a row!
      +Ess:n      K     ;

!! Words in lexicon GEAVNNIS are contracted propernouns ending on -s.

!LEXICON GEAVNNIS-obj
! +N+Prop+Sem/Obj:%> GEAVNNISDECL ;

!LEXICON GEAVNNIS-org
! +N+Prop+Sem/Org:%> GEAVNNISDECL_PLC-ORG ;

!LEXICON GEAVNNIS-mal
! +N+Prop+Sem/Mal:%>  GEAVNNISDECL ;

!LEXICON GEAVNNIS-fem
! +N+Prop+Sem/Fem:%>  GEAVNNISDECL ;

!LEXICON GEAVNNIS-sur
! +N+Prop+Sem/Sur:%> GEAVNNISDECL ;


LEXICON GEAVNNIS-plc !!= @CODE@  Contracted stems ending on -es. Place names. Lule sami stems.
                   +N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%>                 GEAVNNISDECL-PLC ;
 +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen@U.Cap.Opt@:%>Y7000@U.Cap.Opt@ VUONAK           ;

!!€gt-norm: Gaza-Sárges # Contracted test
!!€ Gaza-Sárges:                 Gaza-Sárges+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom
!!€ Gaza-Sárggáj:              Gaza-Sárges+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill
!!€ Gaza-Sárggás:               Gaza-Sárges+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ela


LEXICON GEAVNNISDECL
 @U.Cap.Obl@ GEAVNNISUCASE ;

LEXICON GEAVNNISDECL-ORG
 @U.Cap.Obl@ GEAVNNISUCASE-ORG ;

LEXICON GEAVNNISDECL-PLC
 @U.Cap.Obl@ GEAVNNISUCASE ;
 @U.Cap.Opt@:@U.Cap.Opt@Q1 LASJ          ; ! XXX Sub?

LEXICON GEAVNNISUCASE
 +Sg+Nom:Q1s    K     ;
 +Sg+Nom:Q1s    RHyph ;
    +Ess:Q1n    K     ; !do we want short essive for propers, makes Sirgen
 +Sg+Ill:X4j    K     ;
    +Ess:X4n    K     ; !Sirggán
 +Sg+Gen:X4     K     ;
 +Sg+Gen:X4     RHyph ;
 +Sg+Acc:X4v    K     ;
 +Sg+Ine:X4n    K     ;
 +Sg+Ela:X4s    K     ;
 +Pl+Nom:X4     K     ;
 +Pl+Gen:X4j    K     ;
 +Pl+Gen:X4j    RHyph ;
 +Pl+Acc:X4jt   K     ;
 +Pl+Ill:X4jda  K     ;
 +Pl+Ine:X4jn   K     ;
 +Pl+Ela:X4js   K     ;
 +Pl+Com:X4j    K     ;
 +Sg+Com:X4X5jn K     ;

LEXICON GEAVNNISUCASE-ORG
 +Sg+Nom:Q1s    K     ;
 +Sg+Nom:Q1s    RHyph ;
    +Ess:Q1n    K     ;
 +Sg+Ill:X4j    K     ;
    +Ess:X4n    K     ;
 +Sg+Gen:X4     K     ;
 +Sg+Gen:X4     RHyph ;
 +Sg+Acc:X4v    K     ;
 +Sg+Ine:X4n    K     ;
 +Sg+Ela:X4s    K     ;
! +Pl+Nom:X4 K ;
! +Pl+Gen:X4j K ;
! +Pl+Gen:X4j RHyph ;
! +Pl+Acc:X4jt K ;
! +Pl+Ill:X4jda K ;
! +Pl+Ine:X4jn K ;
! +Pl+Ela:X4js K ;
! +Pl+Com:X4j K ;
 +Sg+Com:X4X5jn K     ;

!! Words in lexicon SUOLLOT are contracted plurals. Lule sami stems.

LEXICON SULLOT-plc !!= @CODE@ Plural names, only names ending on -suollu.
        +N+Prop+Sem/Plc: SULLOTDECL-PLC ;
        
!!€gt-norm: Falklandsuollu #  test
!!$ Falklandsuoloj:              Falklandsuollu+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom
!!€ Falklandsuollu:              Falklandsuollu+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Nom
!!€ Falklandsuollujda:           Falklandsuollu+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Ill
!!€ Falklandsuollujs:            Falklandsuollu+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Ela

LEXICON SULLOTDECL-PLC
        @U.Cap.Obl@               SULLOTCASE ;
        @U.Cap.Opt@               LASJ       ;
 +Sg+Gen@U.Cap.Opt@:00@U.Cap.Opt@ VUONAK     ;

LEXICON SULLOTCASE
    +Ess:%>Q3n    K     ;
    +Ess:%>X4n    K     ;
 +Pl+Nom:%>X4     K     ;
 +Pl+Gen:%>X4j    K     ;
 +Pl+Gen:%>X4j    RHyph ;
 +Pl+Acc:%>X4jt   K     ;
 +Pl+Ill:%>X4jda  K     ;
 +Pl+Ine:%>X4jn   K     ;
 +Pl+Ela:%>X4js   K     ;
 +Pl+Com:%>X4j    K     ;
!+Sg+Com:%>X4X5jn K     ;

 
!! !!Lexicons only used in sme/sma and that are sent to other lexicons in smj
! =============

!! ERVASTI is only used in smi-propenouns. Ervasti names are 3-syllable and are needed as a seperate lexicon because of sma. ERVASTI is same as ACCRA in smj and gets even syllable case marking.

LEXICON ERVASTI-fem
    :i  ACCRA-fem ;

LEXICON ERVASTI-mal
    :i  ACCRA-mal ;

LEXICON ERVASTI-ani
    :i  ACCRA-ani ;

LEXICON ERVASTI-obj
    :i  ACCRA-obj ;

LEXICON ERVASTI-sur
    :i  ACCRA-sur ;

LEXICON ERVASTI-org
    :i  ACCRA-org ;

LEXICON ERVASTI-plc
    :i  ACCRA-plc ;
    
LEXICON ERVASTI-plcmal
	:i  ACCRA-plc ;
    :i  ACCRA-mal ;

LEXICON ERVASTI-LOAN-plc
    :i  ACCRA-LOAN-plc ;

!! MAKI and NIEMI is only used in smi-propenouns. Maki names are even-syllable finnish names and are needed as a seperate lexicon because of sma. MÄKI is same as ACCRA in smj and gets even syllable case marking.

LEXICON MAKI-fem
  :i ACCRA-sur ;

LEXICON MAKI-mal
   :i ACCRA-sur ;

LEXICON MAKI-sur
   :i ACCRA-sur ;

LEXICON MAKI-org
   :i ACCRA-plc ;

LEXICON MAKI-plc
   :i ACCRA-plc ;

LEXICON MAKI-LOAN-plc !Unødvendig lexicon, alle MAKI er LOAN, endres i smi
   ACCRA-LOAN-plc ;
   
LEXICON NIEMI 
   :i ACCRA-plc ;
   
LEXICON flagK
@U.Cap.Obl@ K ;

! From SME?

LEXICON CNAME_EVEN-org
	FirstTag ;
	
LEXICON CNAME_ODD-plc
	LONDON-plc ;

! FirstTag

LEXICON FirstTag
+N+Prop+Attr:%> flag# ;

LEXICON flag#
@U.Cap.Obl@ # ;
