src/morphology/stems/propernouns.lexc
LEXICON ProperNoun
Andamansuollu:Andaman^suollu SULLOT-plc ;
Baffinsuoloj:Baffin^suollu DAVVISUOLU-plc ;
Bahamasuollu:Bahama^suollu SULLOT-plc ;
Ballenysuollu:Balleny^suollu SULLOT-plc ;
Bankssuoloj:Banks^suollu DAVVISUOLU-plc ;
Bermudasuollu:Bermuda^suollu SULLOT-plc ;
Betsávrsáttoj:Bets^ávr^sáddu DAVVISUOLU-plc ;
Bietsisjsuoloj:Bietsisj^suollu DAVVISUOLU-plc ;
Falklandsuollu:Falk^land^suollu SULLOT-plc ;
Fidjisuollu:Fidji^suollu SULLOT-plc ;
Færasuollu:Færa^suollu SULLOT-plc ;
Galapagossuollu:Galapagos^suollu SULLOT-plc ;
Gasska-Andamansuollu:Gasska-Andaman^suollu SULLOT-plc ;
Gaza-sárges:Gaza-sárgge GEAVNNIS-plc ;
Gievgessuoloj:Gievges^suollu DAVVISUOLU-plc ;
Hawaiisuollu:Hawaii^suollu SULLOT-plc ;
Ijnasuoloj:Ijna^suollu DAVVISUOLU-plc ;
India% suollu:India% suollu SULLOT-plc ;
Jabbmeksuoloj:Jabbmek^suollu DAVVISUOLU-plc ;
Jámiksuoloj:Jámik^suollu DAVVISUOLU-plc ;
Jánánsuoloj:Jánán^suollu DAVVISUOLU-plc ;
Kanáriasuollu:Kanária^suollu SULLOT-plc ;
Kurilsuollu:Kuril^suollu SULLOT-plc ;
Malvinassuollu:Malvinas^suollu SULLOT-plc ;
Marshallsuollu:Marshall^suollu SULLOT-plc ;
Melvillesuoloj:Mel^ville^suollu DAVVISUOLU-plc ;
Nikobarsuollu:Nikobar^suollu SULLOT-plc ;
Orkneysuollu:Orkney^suollu SULLOT-plc ;
Ruoktosuoloj:Ruokto^suollu DAVVISUOLU-plc ;
Salomonsuollu:Salomon^suollu SULLOT-plc ;
Scottsuoloj:Scott^suollu DAVVISUOLU-plc ;
Seychellsuollu:Seychell^suollu SULLOT-plc ;
Signysuollu:Signy^suollu SULLOT-plc ;
Sirges:Sirgge GEAVNNIS-plc ; !village
Solovecksuollu:Soloveck^suollu SULLOT-plc ;
Stuorsuoloj:Stuor^suollu DAVVISUOLU-plc ;
Sundasuollu:Sunda^suollu SULLOT-plc ;
Vancouversuoloj:Vancouver^suollu DAVVISUOLU-plc ;
Victoriasuoloj:Victoria^suollu DAVVISUOLU-plc ;
Wrangelsuoloj:Wrangel^suollu DAVVISUOLU-plc ;
Stuorsuoloj:Stuor^suollu DAVVISUOLU-plc ;
